Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.155

Information on funding availability, payments, administrative costs—Posting on departmental website.

(1) Within current funding levels, the department's crime victims' compensation program shall post on its public website a report that shows the following items:

(a) The total amount of current funding available in the crime victims' compensation fund;

(b) The total amount of funding disbursed to victims in the previous thirty days; and

(c) The total amount paid in overhead and administrative costs in the previous thirty days.

(2) The information listed in subsection (1) of this section must be posted and maintained on the department's website by July 1, 2010, and updated every thirty days thereafter.

[ 2010 c 122 s 7.]